Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.101

Report to transportation entities—Tort claims.

The attorney general shall prepare annually a report to the transportation committees of the legislature, the governor, the department of transportation, and the transportation commission comprising a comprehensive summary of all cases involving tort claims against the department of transportation involving highways which were concluded and closed in the previous calendar year. The report shall include for each case closed:

(1) A summary of the factual background of the case;

(2) Identification of the attorneys representing the state and the opposing parties;

(3) A synopsis of the legal theories asserted and the defenses presented;

(4) Whether the case was tried, settled, or dismissed, and in whose favor;

(5) The approximate number of attorney hours expended by the state on the case, together with the corresponding dollar amount billed therefore; and

(6) Such other matters relating to the case as the attorney general deems relevant or appropriate, especially including any comments or recommendations for changes in statute law or agency practice that might effectively reduce the exposure of the state to such tort claims.

[ 2006 c 334 s 14; 2005 c 319 s 104; 1995 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 527.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 334: See note following RCW 47.01.051.

Findings—Intent—Part headings—Effective dates—2005 c 319: See notes following RCW 43.17.020.

Effective dates—1995 2nd sp.s. c 14: See note following RCW 43.19.1919.

Severability—1995 2nd sp.s. c 14: See note following RCW 43.19.1919.